Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1122
Replacement or alteration of chemigation equipment; notice; inspection.

Any permitholder who replaces or alters or authorizes the replacement or alteration of chemigation equipment which was previously approved by the district shall notify the district within seventy-two hours of such replacement or alteration. The district shall conduct an inspection of the replaced or altered equipment and shall approve the continuance of chemigation if the replaced or altered equipment remains in compliance with the requirements of section 46-1127. No additional permit fee shall be collected by the district for inspecting a previously approved injection location.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 22.